Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Short Title and Reservation of Power

§ 17-19-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act.”

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-102.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The legislature shall have the power to amend or repeal all or part of this act at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this act shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).